Georgia, session 2025_26, HB324.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 2 of Title 21 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to primaries and
elections generally, is amended by revising Code Section 21-2-385.1, relating to preferential
treatment for older and disabled voters, as follows:
"21-2-385.1.
During the period of advance voting established pursuant to subsection (d) of Code
Section 21-2-385, each elector who is 75 years of age or older, blind, deaf, an amputee,
pregnant, accompanied by one or more children of two years of age or younger,
accompanied by one or more children with special needs regardless of the age of such
H. B. 324 (SUB)
- 1 -

LC 47 3464S
child, or who is disabled and requires assistance in casting an absentee ballot in person at
the registrar's office, absentee ballot clerk's office, or other locations as provided for in
Code Section 21-2-382 shall, upon request to a designated office employee or other
individual, be authorized to vote immediately at the next available voting compartment or
booth without having to wait in line if such location utilizes direct recording electronic
voting systems or be authorized to go to the head of any line necessary to cast a written
absentee ballot. Notice of the provisions of this Code section shall be prominently
displayed in the registrar's office or absentee ballot clerk's office."
SECTION 2.
Said chapter is further amended by revising Code Section 21-2-409.1, relating to voting by
electors who are 75 years of age or older or disabled electors without having to wait in line,
as follows:
"21-2-409.1.
On election day between the hours of 9:30 A.M. and 4:30 P.M., each elector who is 75
years of age or older, blind, deaf, an amputee, pregnant, accompanied by one or more
children of two years of age or younger, accompanied by one or more children with special
needs regardless of the age of such child, or who is disabled and requires assistance in
voting as authorized by Code Section 21-2-409, shall, upon request to a poll officer, be
authorized at any primary or election to vote immediately at the next available voting
compartment or booth without having to wait in line. Notice of the provisions of this Code
section shall be prominently displayed in the voting place."
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 324 (SUB)
- 2 -